

Loton Corp: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback















loton corp
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Communications
Industry: Media
Sub-Industry: Publishing & Broadcasting
Loton Corporation intends to provide three dimensional (3D) rendering, animation and architectural visualization services.  The Company intends to use advanced computer technology to produce photo realistic 3D rendering, walk-through animation and 360 degree panoramas.




Corporate Information
Address:

4751 Wilshire Blvd
Los Angeles, CA 90010
United States


Phone:
1-310-601-2500


Fax:
1-450-988-1288





Board Members




Chairman/President
Company


Robert Ellin
Loton Corp








Board Members
Company






























From The Web












Press Releases




Jake Paul Joins LiveXLive Music Streaming Network As A Content Creator

22 hours ago



LiveXLive and Paleo Festival Enter Exclusive, Multi-Year Production and Worldwide Distribution Partnership

Jul 11, 2017



Craig Foster Joins LiveXLive Board of Directors

Jul 07, 2017



K-Pop Superstars BTS Debut "The Secret Show" Exclusively on LiveXLive

Jun 16, 2017



King Bach joins LiveXLive as Contributing Social Editor and Content Creator

Jun 05, 2017



LiveXLive Acquires Wantickets, Expanding Reach to Millions of Engaged Live Music Fans

May 15, 2017



LiveXLive's Parent Company, Loton, Corp., Files Registration Statement for Proposed Public Offering

May 12, 2017



LiveXLive and Hangout Music Festival enter Exclusive, Multi-Year Production and Worldwide Distribution Partnership

May 04, 2017






Key Executives


Robert S Ellin


Chairman/President




Douglas Schaer


Chief Operating Officer




Schuyler Hoversten


Chief Revenue Officer




Jerome N Gold "Jerry"


Exec VP/CFO




Blake Indursky


Exec VP/Chief Business Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data





































  LTNR Stock Quote - Loton Corp - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Loton Corp   LTNR:US      Ticker Change   LTNR:US has changed to a new ticker symbol   USD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Consumer Discretionary   % Price Change +0.86%     Industry Media   % Price Change -0.08%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Loton Corporation intends to provide three dimensional (3D) rendering, animation and architectural visualization services.  The Company intends to use advanced computer technology to produce photo realistic 3D rendering, walk-through animation and 360 degree panoramas.    Address  4751 Wilshire BlvdLos Angeles, CA 90010United States   Phone  1-310-601-2500   Website   -     Executives Board Members    Robert S Ellin  Chairman/President    Douglas Schaer  Chief Operating Officer    Schuyler Hoversten  Chief Revenue Officer    Jerome N Gold "Jerry"  Exec VP/CFO    Blake Indursky  Exec VP/Chief Business Officer     Show More         








LOTON CORP - OTC:LTNR - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















LOTON CORP (LTNR)
Follow




                                    5.45
                                

0.09
1.68




                        OTC 
                    

Sep 16, 2015 3:05 PM EDT












Prev Close
  5.36


Open
4.55


Day Low/High

                                    4.55 /
                                    5.45


52 Wk Low/High

                                    2.00 /
                                    6.00
                                


Volume
500.00











Exchange
OTC


Shares Outstanding
45.02M


Market Cap
211.62M


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            N.A. (N.A)
                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News









Loton Adds Steve Bornstein To Its Advisory Board











Chris McGurk Joins Loton, Corp.'s Advisory Board













Loton Adds Steve Bornstein To Its Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (OTC Pink:LTNR) announced that digital media and consumer products executive Steve Bornstein has joined Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Mar 18, 2015 7:32 PM EDT







Chris McGurk Joins Loton, Corp.'s Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that media and entertainment studio executive Christopher J.


Business Wire

Mar 11, 2015 5:13 PM EDT







Loton Adds Jason Port To Its Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (OTC Pink: LTNR) announced that digital media and consumer products executive Jason Port has joined Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Mar 9, 2015 4:31 PM EDT







Loton Announces That John Petrocelli Will Serve As President Of Its Newly Created FestreamTV Subsidiary
Loton, Corp. (OTC Pink:LTNR) announced that digital media veteran John Petrocelli has entered into an agreement to become President of Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Mar 4, 2015 8:08 PM EST







Loton Subsidiary Enters Into Agreement With Andy Schuon Through His Elevated Networks Company To Assist In The Development Of Its FestreamTV Platform
Loton, Corp. (OTC Pink: LTNR) announced that it has entered into an agreement with Elevated Networks for its FestreamTV platform.


Business Wire

Mar 2, 2015 5:48 PM EST







Loton Adds Jon Merriman Of Merriman Holdings To Its Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (OTC Pink: LTNR) announced that brokerage and banking industry executive Jon Merriman has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Feb 24, 2015 2:26 PM EST







Loton Adds Springboard Productions' Hank Neuberger To Its Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that digital media veteran Hank Neuberger has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Feb 3, 2015 1:48 PM EST







Loton Enters Into Letter Of Intent To Acquire 51% Of The Kluger Agency
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that the company has entered into a letter of intent to acquire a majority interest in advertising agency, The Kluger Agency ("TKA").


Business Wire

Jan 29, 2015 12:54 PM EST







Loton Enters Into Agreement With Bulldog Digital Media's John Petrocelli To Lead New Music Streaming Services Business
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that digital media veteran John Petrocelli has entered into an agreement with Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Nov 17, 2014 3:10 PM EST







Loton Adds Jason Flom To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that music industry veteran Jason Flom has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Nov 13, 2014 11:34 AM EST







Loton Adds Tim Spengler To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that media and advertising industry veteran Tim Spengler has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 23, 2014 2:19 PM EDT







Loton Adds Sandy Climan To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that media industry veteran Sandy Climan 
      has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Jun 3, 2014 7:36 PM EDT







Loton Completes Acquisition Of Fifty Percent Interest In KOKO And Appoints Oliver Bengough As CEO
Loton, Corp. (OTCBB:LTNR) announced that it has completed the previously 
      announced acquisition of a fifty percent interest in KOKO, has a 
      commitment to acquire the remaining 50% of KOKO from Oliver Bengough and 
      has...


Business Wire

May 6, 2014 12:33 PM EDT







Loton, Corp. Announces Letter Of Intent To Acquire KOKO
Loton, Corp. (OTCBB:LTNR) (the “Company” or “Loton”) today announced 
      that it is has entered a non-binding Letter of Intent to acquire KOKO, a 
      premier multimedia and lifestyle brand and one of...


Business Wire

Feb 25, 2014 3:11 PM EST







Loton Adds Peter Katsis To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that music industry veteran Peter Katsis 
      has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Jan 22, 2014 3:21 PM EST







Loton Adds Ivan Gavin To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that music industry veteran Ivan Gavin has 
      joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Dec 12, 2013 3:43 PM EST







Loton Adds Stuart Goldfarb As Advisor
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Stuart Goldfarb has joined Loton, 
      Corp.


Business Wire

Nov 13, 2013 1:38 PM EST







Loton Adds William Zaccheo As Advisor
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that William Zaccheo, Principal of zTHREE, 
      LLC, has joined Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 18, 2013 5:59 PM EDT







Loton Adds Todd Waks As Advisor
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Todd Waks, President of Entertainment 
      Alliances, has joined Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 16, 2013 1:14 PM EDT







Loton Adds Shaquille O’Neal, Former NBA Star, To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Shaquille O’Neal, former NBA star, 
      has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 11, 2013 1:11 PM EDT







Loton Adds Jack Schneider To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Jack Schneider, President of PR 
      Partners, has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 4, 2013 3:07 PM EDT







Loton, Corp. Appoints Barry Regenstein as Interim Chief Financial Officer
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Barry Regenstein has been appointed 
      Interim Chief Financial Officer of Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Oct 1, 2013 4:26 PM EDT







Loton Adds Perry Rogers To Advisory Board
Loton, Corp. (LTNR) announced that Perry Rogers, President of PR 
      Partners, has joined the Loton, Corp.


Business Wire

Sep 25, 2013 5:10 PM EDT




































 


















Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 












 



Loton, Corp. Announces Letter of Intent to Acquire KOKO | Business Wire


























































Loton, Corp. Announces Letter of Intent to Acquire KOKO






February 25, 2014 03:11 PM Eastern Standard Time



LOS ANGELES--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Loton, Corp. (OTCBB:LTNR) (the “Company” or “Loton”) today announced 
      that it is has entered a non-binding Letter of Intent to acquire KOKO, a 
      premier multimedia and lifestyle brand and one of London’s iconic live 
      music venues. KOKO is internationally renowned for delivering over 250 
      live music events per year for the past ten years.
    


      KOKO delivers a premier program of digital, live shows and TV 
      entertainment to an international audience. 400,000 music fans step 
      through its doors annually to see classic artists such as Coldplay, 
      Pharrell, Christina Aguilera, Prince, and Madonna. The venue is also the 
      home of London Live, the UK’s longest running and internationally 
      syndicated live concert series, which is currently distributed into 300 
      million TV homes globally in over 70 different countries, having 
      featured Usher, Kanye West and Lady Gaga.
    

      KOKO has worked with the finest EDM talent in the world today from 
      Swedish House Mafia, David Guetta, Calvin Harris, Diplo and Skrillex to 
      underground Berlin super DJ’s such as Paul Kalkbrenner and French Techno 
      artist Gesaffelstein. The company has enjoyed a ten-year partnership 
      with NME, the world’s biggest standalone music site, with more than 7 
      million users per month. KOKO and NME have been successful breaking new 
      acts including the Gossip, Bloc Party, MGMT and Hard Fi.
    

      The acquisition will provide an opportunity for KOKO to expand the 
      delivery of high-quality content across mobile devices and digital 
      platforms globally. KOKO’s mission is to replicate the tremendous 
      success of other UK-based lifestyle brands (Virgin Records, Hard Rock, 
      The Beatles, Soho House, and Hakkasan), expanding into the US and around 
      the world. To date, the company has collaborated with several premier 
      global brands including Apple (launching iTunes Festival), Spotify, 
      Diesel, Chanel, MTV, AOL and Virgin Records (40th 
      Anniversary). KOKO will seek opportunities that leverage, license and 
      expand its brand, whether in collaboration with other global companies 
      or on its own.
    

      “We are excited to announce this letter of intent to acquire KOKO’s 
      brand and venue. Our team will assist in the expansion of Koko’s brand 
      across the globe and the creation of a 360-degree music platform,” 
      commented Robert Ellin, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Loton, 
      Corp. “We are elated to partner with Olly Bengough, Founder and CEO of 
      KOKO. His track record of building exceptionally profitable lifestyle 
      brands in London fits perfectly with our assembly of a world-class team 
      of executives and board members.”
    

      Loton is backed by Trinad Capital, a micro-cap and small-cap activist 
      hedge fund based in Los Angeles, California. The fund is led by Robert 
      Ellin, a seasoned portfolio manager with 25 years of investment 
      experience. Mr. Ellin spearheaded investments in several publicly traded 
      companies including ThQ, Grand Toys, Forward Industries (FORD), Majesco 
      Entertainment (COOL), Command Security (MOC), Mandalay Digital Group 
      (MNDL), iVillage (IVIL), Points International (PCOM), as well as private 
      companies including iWon.com and SS industries.
    

      Stella Capital Advisors provided advisory services to KOKO’s 
      shareholders on this transaction. Loton has a ninety-day period to enter 
      into a definitive Acquisition Agreement. Additional details of the 
      transaction will be disclosed once an agreement has been executed.
    

About Loton, Corp.


      Loton, Corp. (OTCBB:LTNR) is currently considered to be a “blank check” 
      company. The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) defines 
      those companies as “any development stage company that is issuing a 
      penny stock, within the meaning of Section 3(a)(51) and Rule 3a51-1 of 
      the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), 
      and that has no specific business plan or purpose, or has indicated that 
      its business plan is to merge with an unidentified company or companies. 
      The Company’s principal business objective for the next 12 months and 
      beyond such time will be to achieve long-term growth potential through a 
      combination with a business rather than immediate, short-term earnings. 
      The Company will not restrict its potential candidate target companies 
      to any specific business, industry or geographical location and, thus, 
      may acquire any type of business.
    

Forward-Looking Statement


      Statements in this news release concerning future results from 
      operations, financial position, economic conditions, product releases 
      and any other statement that may be construed as a prediction of future 
      performance or events are forward-looking statements which involve known 
      and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause 
      actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by 
      such statements. These factors include uncertainties as to levels of 
      orders, ability to record revenues, release schedules, market acceptance 
      of new products, changes in economic conditions and market demand, 
      pricing and other activities by competitors, and other risks including 
      those described from time to time in the Company’s filings on Forms 10K 
      and 10Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), press 
      releases and other communications.
    


Contacts

      Loton, Corp.Robert Ellin, 310-601-2500Chairman and Chief 
      Executive Officer
    










Release Summary
Loton, Corp. today announced that it is has entered a non-binding Letter of Intent to acquire KOKO, a premier multimedia and lifestyle brand and one of London’s iconic live music venues.






Contacts

      Loton, Corp.Robert Ellin, 310-601-2500Chairman and Chief 
      Executive Officer
    








 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up












Loton Corp LIVX Profile-Financials-Revenues-Growth-Market-Description                       Please wait while the search results are loading...     Plunkett Research,® Ltd.Our Market Research = Your Smart Decisions  What are you looking for?    Information Marketing & Research PROS   Information for Students & Professors   Subscribers Log In     Home >  Industries  >    > Loton Corp     Plunkett Research Online: Loton Corp    LOTON CORP (LIVX:PINX) Company Profile, Corporate Revenues, Growth, Market Size, Analysis, Business Forecasts, Market Share, Metrics, SWOTLoton Corp is a United States based company which provides emerging live and digital music space content, including live music events. The company operates through its subsidiary LiveXLive, Corp. It focuses on operating live music streaming network that delivers live music to viewers on any connecte..... Loton Corp  Ticker: LIVXExchange: PINXParent Company: Year Established: Employees: Fiscal Year Ends in  Phone: 438 870-1351Fax: Address: 269 South Beverly DriveSuite No. 1450Beverly Hills, CA 90212 United States MapTypes Of Business Industry Ranks  Total RevenueMarket CapEmployee CountNet IncomeRevenue 3Y GrowthIncome 3Y GrowthReturn on Assets (%)Return on Equity (%)Return on Invested Capital (%) Industry NAICS code:   Refreshing... Ranks not availableContacts Excel TextDescription Oliver BengoughCEO/DirectorBarry RegensteinCFO See More Loton Corp is a United States based company which provides emerging live and digital music space content, including live music events. The company operates through its subsidiary LiveXLive, Corp. It focuses on operating live music streaming network that delivers live music to viewers on any connecte.....See More See More Auditor: Weinberg & Company Legal Advisor:    Financial Details  Compare to Industry Averages  Build Custom Table  Compare Companies $USD, In whole numbers,  except marked * or %201720162015201420142013Financials    Revenue    Cost of Revenue    Gross  Margin %    R&D Expense    Operating  Income    Operating  Margin %    SGA Expense    Net  Income    Earnings Per Share    Dividends    Book Value Per Share    Operating  Cash  Flow    Capital  Expenditure    Free  Cash  FlowProfitability    EBITDA    Return on Assets %    Return on Equity %    Net  Margin %    Assets  Turnover    Financial  LeverageBrands, Divisions and AffiliatesTop Salaries  NameTitleSalary (US$)Bonus (US$)Other ThoughtsCorporate CultureApparent Female Officers or Directors:     Javascript is disabled.    Request Free Trial Subscriptions Plans & Pricing500 Industries Analyzed for Market Size, Profits and Forecasts25,000 Companies Profiled, Ranked100,000 Industry Statistics150,000 Industry Executives Profiled1,000,000 Words of Trends Analysis Printed Almanacs and Ebooks Custom Research ProjectsA REPRESENTATIVE LIST OF ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE USED OUR RESEARCH PRODUCTS:         Take a TourHow to Use Plunkett Research Online-8 MinutesPlunkett Online AccessPlunkett Research BooksContactPhone: 713.932.0000Alternate Phone: 713.961.3282Fax: 713.932.7080E-Mail UsAsk a Product QuestionMedia Interviews, Get a SpeakerCustom ResearchInternational Distributors ListNews & RSSTestimonials  Your tool is very comprehensive and immensely useful. The vertical marketing tool is very helpful, for it assists us in that venue, as well as targeting customers’ competition for new sales…The comprehensive material is absolutely fabulous. I am very impressed, I have to say! Tammy Dalton, National Account Manager, MCI, Tammy Dalton  We are especially trying to push Plunkett since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use.  St. John’s College, Library Services  I’m amazed at how much information is available and the various ways to access it. This will be a major resource for our serious job seekers.  Penn State University, Career Services  I really appreciate the depth you were able to get to so quickly (for our project). The team has looked through the material and are very happy with the data you pulled together.  Marketing Manager, Hilton Worldwide  Plunkett Research Online is an excellent resource…the database contains a wealth of useful data on sectors and companies, which is easy to search and well presented.   Help and advice on how to conduct, export and save searches is available at all stages. Penny Crossland, Editor, VIP Magazine  The more I get into the database, the happier I am that we’ll have it–REALLY happy!!!  Between the quality and affordability of your product, its appeal to and value for our users, and the inestimably ethical and loyalty-guaranteeing conduct of your business, I will always have more than sufficient praises to sing for Plunkett Research. Michael Oppenheim, Collections & Reference Services, UCLA  Plunkett Research Online provides a great ‘one stop shop’ for us to quickly come up to speed on major industries. It provides us with an overall analysis of the market, key statistics, and overviews of the major players in the industry in an online service that is fast, easy to navigate, and reliable. Wendy Stotts, Manager, Carlson Companies-Information Center  We are especially trying to push Plunkett’s since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use. Gary White, Business Materials Selector, Penn State University     Sign up for Free Research Reports   Subscribe                                 
 



Loton, Corp Enters into Letter of Intent to Sell Its Interest in KOKO and for LiveXLive Subsidiary to Obtain Exclusive Digital Streaming Rights for KOKO Events | Business Wire


























































Loton, Corp Enters into Letter of Intent to Sell Its Interest in KOKO 
      and for LiveXLive Subsidiary to Obtain Exclusive Digital Streaming 
      Rights for KOKO Events






September 11, 2015 04:09 PM Eastern Daylight Time



LOS ANGELES--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Loton, Corp (OTC: LIVX) has entered into a non-binding Letter of Intent 
      to sell its 50% ownership interest in KOKO, London’s iconic live music 
      venue. As part of the proposed transaction, Loton’s wholly-owned 
      subsidiary, LiveXLive, a new live music streaming platform, shall enter 
      into a three (3) year agreement for certain exclusive digital broadcast 
      rights of KOKO events. The proposed sale would strengthen the company’s 
      balance sheet enabling flexibility with regards to future transactions. 
      Any sale would be subject to due diligence and definitive agreements and 
      other approvals.
    

      “We are strategically positioning ourselves away from owning and 
      operating venues toward the focus of securing rights, owning and 
      distributing digital content, and becoming a pure play digital company. 
      LiveXLive plans to leverage the mobile device preference of millions of 
      millennial fans, creating the first independent global live music and 
      lifestyle network delivered across all digital platforms. The proposed 
      digital broadcast rights agreement for KOKO events will represent a 
      milestone in our development. We look forward to announcing many other 
      multiyear agreements with leading venues, festivals and content 
      providers,” said Robert Ellin, LiveXLive Founder and Chairman.
    

      LiveXLive is planning to launch this fall with the world’s first live 
      music streaming platform. Currently, the company is in discussions with 
      content partners, venues and artists from around the world.
    

      KOKO is a premier multimedia and lifestyle brand and one of London's 
      iconic live music venues. KOKO is internationally renowned for 
      delivering over 250 live music events per annum for the past ten years 
      and streaming live music to more than 300 million viewers in 70 
      countries around the globe.
    

About Loton, Corp (OTC: LIVX)


      Loton, Corp (LIVX.OB) is a parent company in the emerging live / digital 
      music space. The company's LiveXLive subsidiary intends to be the 
      world's first premium live music streaming network that will deliver 
      around the clock live music to viewers on any connected device as an 
      authentic and experiential platform. The platform plans to offer the 
      world's leading music festivals with multiday and multistage coverage, 
      unique concerts, intimate performances and cutting edge programming. We 
      plan to extend the live experience to fans on desktop, laptop, mobile, 
      tablets, consoles, connected TVs and virtual reality platforms. The 
      LiveXLive network expects to provide compelling and curated content that 
      showcases the entire spectrum of music to include music inspired 
      fashion, food, and lifestyle content and showcase interviews, backstage 
      access and both fan and artist perspectives. LiveXLive intends to 
      feature all genres of music including rock, pop, indie, alternative, 
      EDM, country and feature major festival headliners as well as emerging 
      artists performing at clubs and venues around the globe.
    

Forward Looking Statement


      Statements in this news release concerning future results from 
      operations, financial position, economic conditions, product releases 
      and any other statement that may be construed as a prediction of future 
      performance or events are forward looking statements which involve known 
      and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause 
      actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by 
      such statements. These factors include uncertainties as to levels of 
      orders, ability to record revenues, release schedules, market acceptance 
      of new products, changes in economic conditions and market demand, 
      pricing and other activities by competitors, and other risks including 
      those described from time to time in the Company's filings on Forms 10-K 
      and 10-Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission, press releases and 
      other communications.
    




Contacts

      Loton, CorpBusiness Inquiries:Robert Ellin, (310) 601-2500Rob@livexlive.com











Release Summary
Loton, Corp has entered a LOI to sell its 50% ownership in KOKO, London’s live music venue. Loton’s subsidiary, LiveXLive shall enter a 3 year agreement for digital broadcast rights of KOKO events.






Contacts

      Loton, CorpBusiness Inquiries:Robert Ellin, (310) 601-2500Rob@livexlive.com









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up

































 



 Loton Corp Expands Deeper Into Music, Announces Its New Live Music Focused Network Subsidiary - 
         










    










 






 











 









Loton Corp Expands Deeper Into Music, Announces Its New Live Music Focused Network Subsidiary - LiveXLive

		  The first independent global live music and lifestyle network delivered across all digital platforms
		

May 13, 2015, 12:37 ET
		  		  								
						 from   Loton, Corp. 











 
















































 

 















































 

 

 
 
 
 







LIveXLive Logo    
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




LIveXLive Logo
 


 

 




 





 


LOS ANGELES, May 13, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Loton Corp (OTC: LTNR) continues to expand into live music with the announcement of its new subsidiary LiveXLive. The company's mission is to aggregate thousands of hours of live music and content driven by live music through mutually beneficial relationships with the world's top talent, music companies, festivals, and promoters. LiveXLive showcases professionally produced, innovative, immersive and experiential live broadcasts in HD. Fans have the opportunity to see their favorite festivals, concerts and experiences on any screen they choose across all video platforms and devices from mobile to the home. These fans can view concert experiences from any connected device with exclusive access only LiveXLive brings from the stage to backstage, inside dressing rooms, and places previously off limits to anyone but VIPs and artists.
"We have assembled industry veterans and elite thought leaders in mobile, over-the-top (OTT), music, media, and technology. This world-class team of professionals has come together to deliver a new consumer experience. Similar to ESPN in sports, LiveXLive will provide consumers with the opportunity to view the most sought after live music around the globe via any distribution channel on a 24/7/365 basis," said LiveXLive founder/chairman Robert Ellin.
Live streamed music is the only remaining media genre without a dominant brand. While sports has ESPN, long-form content has HBO, and news has CNN, there is a tremendous amount of the high quality live music content available without a home. LiveXLive is partnering with rights holders and their influencers (agencies, promoters, venues, artists, and record labels) to build optimal digital strategies thereby increasing revenues for participants in the music world. LiveXLive is also developing key strategic relationships in technology, distribution, advertising, mobile, and virtual reality to augment its network delivery strategy.
The existing market is very significant, with over 3,500 festivals and 40,000+ concerts at 1,000+ venues per annum. These events are the basis for the live content provided by the LiveXLive network. The network is launching in the fall with live streaming network focus extending to desktops, mobile devices, tablets, connected televisions, gaming consoles, and virtual reality platforms.
President of LiveXLive and founder of Bulldog Digital Media, John Petrocelli, believes the expansion of the portfolio provides an opportunity to be the leader in live music. "We believe there is a true opportunity to fill the void in the current content landscape that does not feature a true leader for live streamed premium music experiences. In this nascent market, our team has a keen understanding and expertise on presenting this content in today's world of connected devices and social media platforms. We understand precisely how to execute events, series, and experiences that yield unrivaled engagement," said John Petrocelli.
Bulldog Digital Media is led by a team of ex AEG Digital Media executives who have facilitated the live streams of Coachella, Bonnaroo, Lollapalooza, Outside Lands, American Express Unstaged, The Grammys, Oscars and Masters, as well as hundreds of premium live streamed experiences. Today, this team works with festivals, venues, and artists to represent their live digital content portfolios to brands and agencies.
The LiveXLive advisory board includes Andy Schuon, co-founder of REVOLT and former head of programming at MTV and VH1, Jason Flom, CEO of Lava Records, Chris McGurk, former COO of MGM and CEO of Cinedigm, Steve Bornstein, former CEO of ESPN and the NFL Network as well as other prominent media and investment professionals.
"LiveXLive is well positioned with a credible team of music, video, technology, and brand partnership executives to become the global beacon for live music fans, and a welcome business partner for the music industry," said Andy Schuon.
"The parallels to the sports industry and the acquiring, aggregating, and curating multi-year rights to content much like our work at ESPN are undeniable. In today's connected universe where there is a passionate, global interest in live music, LiveXLive offers a very compelling proposition," said Steve Bornstein.
LiveXLive will go live in the end of the third quarter of this year.
About Loton, Corp.
In April, 2014, Loton, Corp. acquired a fifty percent interest in KOKO, a premier multimedia and lifestyle brand and one of London's iconic live music venues. KOKO is internationally renowned for delivering over 250 live music events per annum for the past ten years. Loton's KOKO subsidiary presented to itunes festival, and London Live, streaming live music to more than 300 million viewers in 70 countries around the globe. Loton is backed by Trinad Capital, a micro-cap and small-cap activist hedge fund based in Los Angeles, California. The fund is led by Robert Ellin, a seasoned portfolio manager with 25 years of investment experience. Mr. Ellin spearheaded investments in several publicly traded companies including ThQ, Grand Toys, Forward Industries (FORD), Majesco Entertainment (COOL), Command Security (MOC), Mandalay Digital Group (MNDL), iVillage (IVIL), Points International (PCOM), as well as private companies including iWon.com and SS industries.
Forward-Looking Statement
Statements in this news release concerning future results from operations, financial position, economic conditions, product releases and any other statement that may be construed as a prediction of future performance or events are forward-looking statements which involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by such statements. These factors include uncertainties as to levels of orders, ability to record revenues, release schedules, market acceptance of new products, changes in economic conditions and market demand, pricing and other activities by competitors, and other risks including those described from time to time in the Company's filings on Forms 10K and 10Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), press releases and other communications.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150513/215845LOGO
 SOURCE  Loton, Corp.  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  
















Jun 23, 2015, 09:17 ET
Preview: Loton Subsidiary Enters Into Agreement With Bruce Perlmutter To Serve as Interim Head of Programming for its LiveXLive (Live by Live) subsidiary















Mar 19, 2015, 19:57 ET
Preview: Loton Subsidiary Enters Into Agreement With Jackie Stone To Assist In The Brand Development and Strategic Partnerships of Its FestreamTV platform






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.




 Read More











Feb 17, 2017, 17:57 ET
Jerry Gold Named Strategic Financial Advisor to the Chairman of...






 More news releases in:

  Computer Electronics
  Multimedia & Internet
  Entertainment
  Music
  Publishing & Information Services
New Products & Services












Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 




















 



 Craig Foster Joins Loton Corp. Board of Directors 
         










    










 













 











 



















Craig Foster Joins Loton Corp. Board of Directors
        																																																																				
              

          The veteran Silicon Valley CFO and former investment banker to head Audit Committee
        
















 News provided by
LiveXLive  
Jul 07, 2017, 12:41 ET









 Share this article




























































BEVERLY HILLS, Calif., July 7, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- The Board of Directors at Loton Corp. (OTC: LIVX), which owns the premium live music streaming platform LiveXLive, today announced the appointment of Craig Foster as a director and head of the board's Audit Committee. Foster, a Silicon Valley financial veteran, was formerly the Chief Financial Officer of Ubiquiti Networks, Inc. and most recently CFO of Amobee, a global digital advertising platform.








"Craig has a track record of making big things happen for rapidly growing companies," said Rob Ellin Executive Chairman and President of LiveXLive. "He has lead merger and acquisitions as well as capital transactions that have been game changing for his companies. Most importantly, he has extensive expertise in taking companies public and has led numerous highly successful IPO's and M&A transactions as both a CFO and banker. I'm confident he will add great value to our Board of Directors and LiveXLive will benefit from his unique experience, skills, and creativity."
"The LiveXLive team is creating a new borderless music entertainment vertical," said Craig Foster. "I believe they are building a strong business positioned for rapid growth, a management team that includes both music/tech industry veterans and digital native innovators, and a vision that truly serves music fans and artists something they crave. I'm looking forward to contributing to the company's success." 
Foster has served as a CFO for Amobee and during his tenure oversaw the turn to profitability and the $310M acquisition of Turn, Inc. Prior to Amobee, Foster was the CFO and a Director at Ubiquiti Networks, the disruptive networking and communications company, where he engineered the highest net income per employee among publicly traded technology companies on NASDAQ and led a stock performance increase of 300% over two years.
Foster held investment banking positions at Credit Suisse and UBS, serving as the Co-head of software at the latter. During his employment, he completed over $8Bn worth of transactions across IPOs, M&A, debt and complex financial instruments. Prior to banking, Foster was an early employee of Loudcloud, Inc. and gained foundational operations experience across management positions in product management, business development and finance. He also held various senior positions at RBC Capital Markets, Open Market, Deloitte Consulting, and PriceWaterhouseCoopers.
Foster holds an M.B.A. in Finance from the Wharton School of Business and a B.A. in Economics from the University of California, San Diego.
Foster is the third member of LiveXLive's Board of Directors and will serve with Chairman Rob Ellin and Director Jay Krigsman. LiveXLive most recently added music industry vet Jerry Gold as Executive Vice President and CFO as well as social media stars Amanda Cerny and King Bach as content creators. 
About Loton, Corp and LiveXLive, CorpLiveXLive, Corp ("LiveXLive"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Loton, Corp ("Loton") is one of the world's only premium internet networks devoted to live music and music-related video content. Since LiveXLive's launch in 2015, LiveXLive has been building an online destination for music fans to enjoy premium live performances from music venues and leading music festivals around the world, such as Rock in Rio, Outside Lands Music and Arts Festival, Hangout Music Festival, as well as premium original content, artist exclusives and industry interviews. The LiveXLive platform has featured performances and content from some of the most popular artists in various music genres, including Rihanna, Katy Perry, Metallica, Duran Duran, Radiohead, Chance The Rapper, Bruce Springsteen, Major Lazer and Maroon 5. For more information, visit our website at www.livexlive.com and follow us on Facebook, Instagram and Twitter at @livexlive. 
Forward Looking StatementAll statements other than statements of historical facts contained in this press release are "forward-looking statements." These statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause actual results, performance or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by such statements. These factors include uncertainties as to identifying, acquiring, securing and developing content, ability to attract and retain users, successfully implementing the company's growth strategy, including relating to its technology platform, management's relationships with industry stakeholders, changes in economic conditions, competition, and other risks including those described from time to time in Loton's filings with the SEC. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date hereof and Loton and LiveXLive disclaim any obligations to update these statements except as may be required by law.
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/craig-foster-joins-livexlive-board-of-directors-300484680.html
SOURCE LiveXLive
 Related Links

http://www.livexlive.com



 

















Jul 11, 2017, 14:14 ET
Preview: LiveXLive and Paleo Festival Enter Exclusive, Multi-Year Production and Worldwide Distribution Partnership




















Jun 16, 2017, 12:33 ET
Preview: K-Pop Superstars BTS Debut "The Secret Show" Exclusively on LiveXLive








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











Jul 24, 2017, 15:55 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Jake Paul Joins LiveXLive Music Streaming Network As A Content...








 











Jul 11, 2017, 14:14 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              LiveXLive and Paleo Festival Enter Exclusive, Multi-Year...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Computer Electronics
  Entertainment
  Music
  OTC, SmallCap
  Networks








 You just read:
Craig Foster Joins Loton Corp. Board of Directors


 News provided by
LiveXLive  
Jul 07, 2017, 12:41 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 













LOTON, CORP IPO - NASDAQ.com



























































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





LOTON, CORP IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
LOTON, CORP


Company Address
269 SOUTH BEVERLY DRIVE3RD FLOORBEVERLY HILLS, CA 90212


Company Phone
(310) 601-2500


Company Website
www.livexlive.com


CEO
Robert S. Ellin


Employees  (as of 6/13/2017) 
24


State of Inc
NV


Fiscal Year End
3/31


Status
Filed (5/11/2017)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
 -- 


Share Price
 -- 


Shares Offered
 -- 


Offer Amount
$100,000,000.00


Total Expenses
 -- 


Shares Over Alloted
 -- 


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
 -- 


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001491419




We estimate that we will receive net proceeds of approximately $    million (or
approximately $    million if the underwriters’ over-allotment option is
exercised in full) from the sale of the shares of common stock offered by us in
this offering, based upon an assumed public offering price of $    per share
(the midpoint of the estimated price range set forth on the cover of this
prospectus), and after deducting the estimated underwriting discounts and
commissions and estimated offering expenses payable by us.

We intend to use the net proceeds of this offering to fund working capital,
capital expenditures and other general corporate purposes, which may include
future acquisitions of businesses and content. We are in preliminary discussions
with a number of entities, each of which we believe would add content,
technology, subscribers or festivals and venues to our business. However, we
have no present understandings, commitments or agreements with respect to any
material acquisition or investment. The amounts and timing of capital
expenditures will be determined by numerous factors, including growth of our
business and cash needs of our business. Therefore, we cannot at this time
estimate the amount of the net proceeds from this offering to be used for any of
the purposes described above.

Our expected use of net proceeds of this offering represents our intentions
based upon our current plans and business conditions. Our management will retain
broad discretion over the allocation of any net proceeds.

Pending use of the proceeds from this offering, we intend to invest the net
proceeds in a variety of capital preservation investments, including short- and
intermediate-term, interest-bearing obligations, investment-grade instruments,
certificates of deposit or direct or guaranteed obligations of the U.S.
government.


While the broader market for live entertainment remains highly competitive, the
digital distribution of live and music-related video content is still a nascent
market. We believe live streamed music video content is the only remaining media
genre without a dominant brand. We believe there is a tremendous amount of high
quality live music content available to be captured and produced but without a
singular home for distribution and access by the public at large.

We expect to compete for the time and attention of our users with other Content
Providers based on a number of factors, including: quality of experience,
relevance, acceptance and diversity of content, ease of use, price,
accessibility, perceptions of advertisement load, brand awareness and
reputation. We also expect to compete for the time and attention of users based
on the presence and/or visibility of the LiveXLive platform as compared with
other platforms and Content Providers that deliver content through
internet-connected screens.

Our competitors will include (i) broadcast radio providers, including
terrestrial radio providers such as Clear Channel and CBS and satellite radio
providers such as Sirius XM, (ii) interactive on-demand audio content and
pre-recorded entertainment, such as Apple’s iTunes Music Store and Apple Music,
Rhapsody, Spotify, Pandora, Tidal and Amazon Prime that allow listeners to
stream music or select the audio content that they stream or purchase, (iii)
other forms of entertainment, including Facebook, Instagram, Google, Twitter
(including Periscope), and Yahoo, which offer a variety of internet and mobile
device-based products, services and content and (iv) promoters and producers of
content on mobile, online and AR/VR platforms such as Redbull TV, Live Nation TV
and independent content owners. To the extent that existing or potential users
choose to watch satellite or cable television, streaming video from on demand
services such as Hulu, VEVO or YouTube, or play interactive video games on their
home-entertainment system, computer or mobile phone rather than use the
LiveXLive service, these content services pose a competitive threat.

We may also face direct competition from other large live music event
competitors with regards to online distribution of live music and music-related
video content, ticketing and sponsorship opportunities, including from Live
Nation, Anschutz Entertainment Group, and Livestyle (formerly SFX). Furthermore,
there are many smaller, regional companies that compete in the market as well.


Company Description
We are one of the world’s only premium internet networks devoted to live music
and music-related video content. We intend to fill a market void by becoming a
central content, information and transaction hub for music consumers and
industry stakeholders around the world. We are geared for the


 digital
generation, and our mission is to bring the experience of live music and
entertainment to internet users by delivering live streamed and on demand
content to nearly any internet-connected screen. Our goal is to become a leading
destination for premium music video content on the internet by continuing to
aggregate and create our content, including through strategic acquisitions. We
are also building a proprietary engagement platform that we believe will attract
and retain users, which we believe will allow us to collect valuable user data
and monetize our growing content library through subscriptions, advertising,
sponsorships and e-commerce.

Since our launch in 2015, we have sought to become the singular online
destination for music fans to enjoy premium live performances from music venues
and leading music festivals around the world, as well as premium original
content, artist exclusives and industry interviews. We have live streamed music
festivals such as Rock in Rio, Outside Lands Music and Arts Festival and Hangout
Music Festival, and our platform has featured performances and content from over
170 of the most popular artists in various music genres, including Rihanna, Katy
Perry, Metallica, Duran Duran, Radiohead, Chance The Rapper, Bruce Springsteen,
Major Lazer and Maroon 5. We have successfully distributed such content through
our online platform and major third party distributors such as MTV
International, AOL and Complex Media.

Our content strategy includes continuing to aggregate live and on demand
performance (e.g., on stage sets) and non-performance (e.g., behind the scenes,
interviews) music-related video content from festivals, clubs, events, concerts,
artists, promoters, venues, music labels and publishers (“Content Providers”);
acquiring and producing original music-related video content; and curating
existing online premium content. In addition to acquiring and/or partnering with
third party Content Providers, our digital studio, LXL Studios, will develop and
produce original music-related video content, including digital magazine-style
news programming and original-concept digital pilots and documentaries.

Our platform engagement strategy is to build a compelling online experience for
our users, anchored by a pioneering website and our custom mobile application,
the “LXL App”. The LiveXLive platform will offer access to some of the world’s
leading music festivals and events with multi-day and simultaneous multi-stage
coverage, unique concerts, intimate performances and premium programming. It
will be fueled by our custom LXL App, which we believe will drive 24/7/365 user
engagement and data that we will be able to convert to earnings and cash flow
through multiple potential revenue streams. We intend to initially release the
first version of the LXL App during summer 2017 on the iOS operating system in
anticipation of Rock in Rio 2017. We plan to release the Android version of the
LXL App and Apple TV, Roku and Amazon Fire TV LiveXLive applications later in
2017.

By executing the above strategies, we are creating a platform that is dedicated
to live music and has the breadth and depth of content to reach and be relevant
to a global audience of all ages.
---

We were incorporated in the State of Nevada on December 28, 2009 and prior to
the completion of this offering we plan to reincorporate in the State of
Delaware. Our principal executive offices are located at 269 South Beverly
Drive, Suite #1450, Beverly Hills, California 90212, and our telephone number is
(310) 601-2500. We maintain a website at www.livexlive.com.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
$225,000


Net Income
-$14,249,719


Total Assets
$1,556,205






Total Liabilities
$4,961,897


Stockholders' Equity
-$3,405,692




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 2 Total: 2
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



LOTON, CORP
S-1/A
6/14/2017
Filing



LOTON, CORP
S-1
5/11/2017
Filing







Experts


Auditor
Weinberg and Company, P.A


Company Counsel
Loeb and Loeb LLP


Lead Underwriter
BMO Capital Markets Corp


Transfer Agent
Island Stock Transfer


Underwriter Counsel
Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6419.06


8.25
 ▲ 
0.13%





DJIA

21633.28


120.11
 ▲ 
0.56%





S&P 500

2479.06


9.15
 ▲ 
0.37%










Data as of Jul 25, 2017 | 2:41PM


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Geek fight! Musk says Zuckerberg naive about killer robots
                        



	                     2:25PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Appeals court rules for NBC in defamation suit over 'bomb' segment
                        



	                     2:20PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            REFILE-NBC beats defamation appeal over 'bomb' segment on 'Today'
                        



	                     2:12PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Hedge fund Marcato tells Rent-A-Center to look at selling itself
                        



	                     2:05PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX





















































Loton, Corp Partners with Delivery Agent to Bring Digital Commerce to Streaming Music Service LiveXLive

















































Data 

Stocks
Events Calendar
Sectors
Investment Strategies
ETFs
CEFs
Mutual Funds
Indices
Economic Indicators
Economic Calendar
News



Tools 

Dashboard
Fundamental Chart
Technical Chart
Equity Screener
Fund Screener
Comp Tables
Timeseries Analysis
Excel
API



Support 

Support Topics
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
About Us
Careers
Financial Glossary


Plans
Free Trial
Sign In

 



Free Trial
Sign In



























Data 

Stocks
Events Calendar
Sectors
Investment Strategies
ETFs
CEFs
Mutual Funds
Indices
Economic Indicators
Economic Calendar
News



Tools 

Dashboard
Fundamental Chart
Technical Chart
Equity Screener
Fund Screener
Comp Tables
Timeseries Analysis
Excel
API



Support 

Support Topics
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
About Us
Careers
Financial Glossary


Plans
Free Trial
Sign In

 



Free Trial
Sign In











Loton, Corp Partners with Delivery Agent to Bring Digital Commerce to Streaming Music Service LiveXLive
Upcoming Outside Lands Festival Kicks-off Partnership Bringing Contextual Commerce to Connected Consumers

August 02, 2016 15:49

LOS ANGELES, Aug. 2, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Loton, Corp's (OTC: LIVX) Loton's LiveXLive subsidiary has entered into a partnership with Delivery Agent, the market leader in turning audiences into customers for the world's leading brands, to enable contextual commerce within the live stream of San Francisco's biggest summer music festival, Outside Lands, taking place August 5 – August 7, 2016. "This partnership marks the first steps in executing our brand merchandising strategy and demonstrates our ability to monetize festival and music related content on our platform," said Robert Ellin, LiveXLive Founder and Chairman. Delivery Agent provides digital commerce solutions across a multitude of devices and platforms for a portfolio of partners including media companies, music labels, CE and streaming device manufacturers, and brand advertisers. Delivery Agent's proprietary commerce platform enables contextual product mapping to entertainment content, delivering the right product at the right time to audiences across connected devices. The LiveXLive partnership will leverage Delivery Agent's Outside Lands contextual product mapping capabilities across the various channels fans can stream the festival."Delivery Agent's role is to take the friction out of purchasing products inspired by entertainment content from programs to ads to live music," said Mike Fitzsimmons, Delivery Agent CEO. "We're thrilled to partner with LiveXLive to bring their fan base a shopping experience that's an integrated extension of their viewing experience - across all connected devices."Since its inaugural live stream event in May 2016, Outside Lands has worked with some of the biggest names in alternative rock, classic rock, rap and hip hop, R&B, indie folk, country and electronica.To stream the Outside Lands festival, fans can visit the LiveXLive website and mobile app.About Delivery Agent, Inc.   Delivery Agent is the market leader in turning audiences into revenue generating customers for the world's largest brands and media companies. Delivery Agent's proprietary ShopTV technology allows audiences to engage with and transact directly from advertisements and television shows through web, mobile, and advanced television applications. Currently in market with leading broadcasters, advertisers, MVPDs, and smart TV manufacturers, Delivery Agent brings scalability, organization, and economic incentive to a disparate ecosystem that has traditionally lacked uniform technical standards and has been challenged by complex rights and revenue sharing issues. The company is deployed and maintains long term partnerships with NBC, FOX, CBS, HBO, Live Nation, Bravado, Pepsi, Visa, Comcast, and Samsung, among others. More information about Delivery Agent is available at www.deliveryagent.co and @deliveryagent.About Loton, Corp (OTC: LIVX)  Loton, Corp. (LIVX.OB) is a parent company in the emerging live / digital music space. The company's LiveXLive subsidiary intends to be the world's first premium live music streaming network that will deliver around the clock live music to viewers on any connected device as an authentic and experiential platform. The platform plans to offer the world's leading music festivals with multiday and multistage coverage, unique concerts, intimate performances and cutting edge programming. We plan to extend the live experience to fans on desktop, laptop, mobile, tablets, consoles, connected TVs and virtual reality platforms. The LiveXLive network expects to provide compelling and curated content that showcases the entire spectrum of music to include music inspired fashion, food, and lifestyle content and showcase interviews, backstage access and both fan and artist perspectives. LiveXLive intends to feature all genres of music including rock, pop, indie, alternative, EDM, country and feature major festival headliners as well as emerging artists performing at clubs and venues around the globe. www.livexlive.com Forward Looking Statement  Statements in this news release concerning future results from operations, financial position, economic conditions, product releases and any other statement that may be construed as a prediction of future performance or events are forward looking statements which involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by such statements. These factors include uncertainties as to levels of orders, ability to record revenues, release schedules, market acceptance of new products, changes in economic conditions and market demand, pricing and other activities by competitors, and other risks including those described from time to time in the Company's filings on Forms 10-K and 10-Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission, press releases and other communications.Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20160225/337602LOGO  To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/loton-corp-partners-with-delivery-agent-to-bring-digital-commerce-to-streaming-music-service-livexlive-300307937.htmlSOURCE  Loton, Corp. 




Related Stories


Loton, Corp Partners with Delivery Agent to Bring Digital Commerce to Streaming Music Service LiveXLive
PR Newswire
            08/02 15:49 ET
        

Loton, Corp's LiveXLive Subsidiary Enters Agreement with Outside Lands Festival
PR Newswire
            08/01 16:20 ET
        

Loton, Corp Enters Binding Agreement to Acquire Wantickets RDM
PR Newswire
            07/20 19:26 ET
        

Loton, Corp's LiveXLive Subsidiary Enters Agreement with Exchange Los Angeles
PR Newswire
            06/14 18:37 ET
        

MTV International partners with LiveXLive for digital broadcast of the final night of Rock in Rio Lisbon on Sunday, May 29 in Latin America and Countries Throughout Europe
PR Newswire
            05/29 17:55 ET
        

Loton, Corp.'s LiveXLive Subsidiary Enters Agreement with E11EVEN Miami
PR Newswire
            05/26 11:35 ET
        

Loton, Corp. Announces Mint Group Has Resigned from its Services Contract with Loton and KOKO's Holding Company
PR Newswire
            05/25 15:54 ET
        

Loton, Corp's LiveXLive Subsidiary Enters Strategic Marketing and Distribution Agreement with Complex
PR Newswire
            05/19 17:18 ET
        

Loton, Corp's LiveXLive Subsidiary Launches New HD Multi-Channel Digital Network in Advance of Worldwide Live Stream of Rock in Rio Music Festival
PR Newswire
            05/17 13:57 ET
        

Loton, Corp's LiveXLive Subsidiary Enters Agreement with OneLive Media Creating New Merchandising Opportunities
PR Newswire
            03/22 08:00 ET
        



Advertisement














{{root.upsell.info.feature_headline}}.

            {{root.upsell.info.feature_description}}
            
Please note that this feature is only available as an add-on to YCharts subscriptions.
            

Please note that this feature requires full activation of your account and is not permitted during the free trial period.
            













            {{root.upsell.info.call_to_action}}
        

            No credit card required.
        


Already a subscriber?
Sign in.
            
























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          
















Fire Tablets - Amazon Devices













 


























Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Fire Tablets



Fire Tablets
All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






Amazon Devices Echo & Alexa Fire Tablets Amazon Fire TV Kindle Dash Button Accessories Certified Refurbished Discussions Kindle Support Manage Your Content and Devices















































































Fire Tablets
Engineered by Amazon, Fire tablets are high performance tablets designed for entertainment at an affordable price.































































































































All-New Fire 7
From $49.99
The next generation of our best-selling Fire tablet ever - now thinner, lighter, and with longer battery life and an improved display.






All-New Fire HD 8
From $79.99
Up to 12 hours of battery life. Vibrant HD display. Fast performance.






All-New Fire 7 Kids Edition
Just $99.99
The #1 kids’ tablet in the US—now even better. Includes 1 year of Amazon FreeTime Unlimited and a Kid-Proof Case, plus a 2-year worry-free guarantee.






All-New Fire HD 8 Kids Edition
Just $129.99
Up to 12 hours of battery. 2X the storage. 8” HD display. Includes 1 year of Amazon FreeTime Unlimited and a Kid-Proof Case, plus a 2-year worry-free guarantee.














































Fire HD 10
From $229.99
Our largest display on our thinnest tablet yet. Perfect for widescreen entertainment.






Accessories
Cases, chargers, styli, sleeves, and much more.






Certified Refurbished
Certified refurbished Fire tablets, Amazon Echo, Amazon Fire TV, and Kindle E-readers.






Fire Tablet Apps
Over 600,000 apps including favorites like Facebook, Twitter, and Spotify.












Compare Fire tablets











ALL-NEW FIRE 7
ALL-NEW FIRE HD 8
ALL-NEW FIRE 7 KIDS EDITION
ALL-NEW FIRE HD 8 KIDS EDITION


Price
Starting at $49.99
Starting at $79.99
$99.99
$129.99

Display
7"
8" HD
7"
8" HD


Resolution
1024 x 600(171 ppi)
1280 x 800(189 ppi)
1024 x 600(171 ppi)
1280 x 800(189 ppi)


Storage
8 or 16 GBexpandable by up to 256 GBFree unlimited cloud storage for Amazon content
16 or 32 GBexpandable by up to 256 GBFree unlimited cloud storage for Amazon content
8 or 16 GBexpandable by up to 256 GB
16 or 32 GBexpandable by up to 256 GB


Battery Life
Up to 8 hours of reading,
surfing the web, watching video, and listening to music
Up to 12 hours of reading,
surfing the web, watching video, and listening to music
Up to 8 hours of reading,
surfing the web, watching video, and listening to music
Up to 12 hours of reading,
surfing the web, watching video, and listening to music


Audio
Mono speaker,
built-in microphone
Dual stereo speaker,
built-in microphone
Mono speaker,
built-in microphone
Dual stereo speaker,
built-in microphone


Alexa Enabled
Yes
Yes
No
No


Colors
Black, Marine Blue, Punch Red, Canary Yellow
Black, Marine Blue, Punch Red, Canary Yellow
Black tablet with choice of Blue, Pink, or Yellow Kid-Proof Case
Black tablet with choice of Blue, Pink, or Yellow Kid-Proof Case


Content
Access to millions of movies, TV episodes, songs, books, apps, games, and more
Access to millions of movies, TV episodes, songs, books, apps, games, and more
1 year of FreeTime Unlimited which offers access to more than 15,000 kid-friendly books, videos, educational apps and games
1 year of FreeTime Unlimited which offers access to more than 15,000 kid-friendly books, videos, educational apps and games


Warranty and Service
90-day limited warranty
90-day limited warranty
2-year worry-free guarantee included
2-year worry-free guarantee included


Cover
Sold separately
Sold separately
Kid-Proof Case included
Kid-Proof Case included


Processor
Quad-core 1.3 GHz


Camera
VGA front-facing camera + 2 MP rear-facing camera with 720p HD video recording


Connectivity
Dual-band Wi-Fi


Weight
10.4 oz (295 g)
13.0 oz (369 g)
13.8 oz (390 g)
17.6 oz (483 g)


Dimensions
7.6" x 4.5" x 0.4"
(192 x 115 x 9.6 mm) 
8.4" x 5.0" x 0.4"
(214 x 128 x 9.7 mm) 
8.7" x 5.5" x 1"
(141 x 222 x 26.3 mm)
9.6" x 6.1" x 1"
(154 x 243 x 26.3 mm)


Customer Support
Screen Sharing + email, web, and phone










Why Fire tablets?











Designed for entertainment
Enjoy millions of movies, TV episodes, songs, books, apps, and games. Choose from millions of Kindle eBook and magazine titles that you won't be able to find anywhere else.
Enjoy all your favorite movies and TV shows on Amazon Video, Netflix, HBO NOW, Sling TV, and more. Enhance your video experience with features you only get from Amazon, including On Deck for watching videos anywhere, ASAP for fast video streaming, and X-Ray to go behind the scenes of your favorite movies and TV shows while you watch.
With millions of songs from thousands of artists, the Amazon Digital Music Store brings all your favorite music to your fingertips. Music you buy on your Fire tablet is saved to Your Music Library for free, and you can play or download it anytime.
Even better with Prime
Prime members enjoy access to thousands of hit movies and TV episodes, ad-free access to over a million songs, over a thousand Kindle books, and Free Two-Day Shipping on millions of items. Plus, Prime members can watch downloaded Prime videos anywhere–on a plane, on vacation, or wherever a wireless connection isn't available.
Meet Alexa
Alexa provides quick access to the entertainment you want, including music, games, audiobooks, and more. You can also ask Alexa questions, check your calendar, get news, find sports scores, and even control your smart home. All you have to do is press and ask.







Made just for them:  Fire Kids Edition tablets











Content kids crave
Amazon FreeTime Unlimited is the first-ever all-in-one subscription that brings together all the types of content that kids ages 3-12 want with  over 15,000 books, movies, TV shows, educational apps, and games. Fire Kids Edition tablets include a year of Amazon FreeTime Unlimited at no
additional cost.
Built for the toughest kids
Each Fire Kids Edition tablet comes with a Kid-Proof Case and a 2-year worry-free guarantee, giving parents peace of mind and kids freedom to play.
Best-in-class parental controls
Amazon FreeTime offers innovative parental controls that encourage learning before play and that help manage
screen time.









1-16 of 28 results for Amazon Devices & Accessories : Amazon Devices : Fire Tablets



Sort by 
Featured
Price: Low to High
Price: High to Low
Avg. Customer Review
Newest Arrivals




















Best Sellerin Computers & AccessoriesAll-New Fire HD 8 Tablet with Alexa, 8" HD Display, 16 GB, Black - with Special Offersby Amazon
$
79
99

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$59.39(5 used offers)
4.3 out of 5 stars
7,422All-New Fire 7 Tablet with Alexa, 7" Display, 8 GB, Black - with Special Offersby Amazon
$
49
99

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$37.12(4 used offers)
4.2 out of 5 stars
4,250All-New Fire HD 8 Kids Edition Tablet, 8" HD Display, 32 GB, Blue Kid-Proof Caseby Amazon
$
129
99

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible orders
4.3 out of 5 stars
699All-New Fire 7 Kids Edition Tablet, 7" Display, 16 GB, Blue Kid-Proof Caseby Amazon
$
99
99

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible orders
4.4 out of 5 stars
528Fire Tablet with Alexa, 7" Display, 8 GB, Black - with Special Offers (Previous Generation - 5th)by Amazon$27.18(3 used offers)See newer version
4.1 out of 5 stars
121,204Fire HD 8 Tablet with Alexa, 8" HD Display, 16 GB, Tangerine - with Special Offers (Previous Generation - 6th)by Amazon
$
69
99

$89.99PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersIn stock on August 3, 2017More Buying Choices$63.74(1 used offer)See newer version
4.3 out of 5 stars
36,194Certified Refurbished Fire HD 10 Tablet, 10.1" HD Display, Wi-Fi, 16 GB - Includes Special Offers, Silver Aluminumby Amazon
$
199
99

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible orders
3.9 out of 5 stars
201Fire HDX 8.9 Tablet, 8.9" HDX Display, Wi-Fi, 64 GB - Includes Special Offersby Amazon$275.00(4 used offers)
4.2 out of 5 stars
6,610Kindle Fire HDX 7", HDX Display, Wi-Fi, 16 GB - Includes Special Offers (Previous Generation - 3rd)by Amazon$70.09(9 used offers)
4.3 out of 5 stars
32,195Fire HD 6 Tablet, 6" HD Display, Wi-Fi, 8 GB - Includes Special Offers, Blackby Amazon$39.99(4 used offers)
4.2 out of 5 stars
27,353Kindle Fire HD 7", HD Display, Wi-Fi, 8 GB - Includes Special Offers (Previous Generation - 3rd)by Amazon$40.83(5 used offers)
4.1 out of 5 stars
18,323Fire HD 7 Tablet, 7" HD Display, Wi-Fi, 8 GB - Includes Special Offers, Blackby Amazon$39.95(2 used offers)
4.3 out of 5 stars
33,871Fire HD 8 Tablet, 8" HD Display, Wi-Fi, 8 GB - Includes Special Offers, Black (Previous Generation - 5th)by Amazon$56.25(7 used offers)
3.9 out of 5 stars
9,351Kindle Fire HDX 8.9", HDX Display, Wi-Fi, 32 GB - Includes Special Offers (Previous Generation - 3rd)by Amazon$283.99(4 used offers)
4.1 out of 5 stars
9,163All-New Fire HD 8 Variety Pack, 16GB - Includes Special Offers (Black/Marine Blue/Punch Red)see all items in bundleSee details for this bundle
$
239
97

Prime
4.4 out of 5 stars
9All-New Fire HD 8 Kids Edition Tablet Variety Pack, 8" HD Display, 32 GB, (Blue/Pink) Kid-Proof Casesee all items in bundleSee details for this bundle
$
259
98

Prime
4 out of 5 stars
9

 
Previous Page
1
2
 
Next Page
















Search FeedbackDid you find what you were looking for?YesNo
Choose a category that best describes the issue that you are having with the search:Choose a category…I need to talk to customer service.I still haven't found what I'm looking for.How do I filter or sort my search ?Something is broken.A picture or description looks wrong.Could you add a feature ?Could you start carrying a product not listed here ?Choose a category…






Leave us some comments about your search; your comments can help make our site better for everyone.Submit

Get Express customer service or contact us by e-mail or phone.contact us

Thank you for your feedback.
If you need help or have a question for Customer Service, please visit the Help Section.Fire TabletsWelcome to the Fire tablets store featuring powerhouse tablets at breakthrough prices, designed for entertainment. Amazon has a wide assortment of tablets that fit into everyone's life. Starting at $49.99 for the all-new Fire 7, $79.99 for the all-new Fire HD 8, $99.99 for the all-new Fire 7 Kids Edition, and $129.99 for the all-new Fire HD 8 Kids Edition.Each tablet is engineered by Amazon with you in mind, featuring a fast and responsive interface, beautiful displays, hours of battery life, and durable designs that stand up to everyday life.Fire tablets are designed for entertainment. You can watch your favorite movies and TV shows on Amazon Video, and with subscriptions to services like Netflix, HBO NOW, and more. Discover hundreds of thousands of TV episodes and movies and fling it all to the big screen. Read over a million titles with a subscription to Kindle Unlimited or choose from millions of titles at the lowest prices, vibrant magazines, and book sharing with Goodreads. Or listen to your favorite books with Audible. Access over 600,000 apps and games including favorites like Facebook, Twitter, and Spotify.Fire OS gives you the best entertainment experience on a tablet with quick access to the things you do most.  The new home screen includes dedicated content pages for books, games and apps, video, music, audiobooks, and Newsstand, making it quick to pick up right where you left off. Powered by Amazon’s recommendations engine, you can quickly browse books, movies, TV shows, songs, apps, and games suggested just for you.


 Amazon DevicesFire TabletsFire TVKindle E-readersEcho and AlexaAmazon Device DealsDash ButtonAccessoriesCertified RefurbishedFire Tablet ContentKindle eBooksPrime VideoDigital MusicFire Tablet Apps and GamesNewsstandNeed help?Manage your Content and DevicesAmazon Device SupportDiscussions 

Show results forNew ReleasesLast 90 days
                                Amazon Devices & Accessories
                                Amazon DevicesFire TabletsRefine byAvg. Customer Review4 Stars & Up & Up3 Stars & Up & Up2 Stars & Up & Up1 Star & Up & UpConditionNewUsedPrice$25 to $50$50 to $100$100 to $200$200 & Above$$Go






















        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.













There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started















Back to top
Get to Know UsCareersAbout AmazonInvestor RelationsAmazon DevicesMake Money with UsSell on AmazonSell Your Services on AmazonSell on Amazon BusinessSell Your Apps on AmazonBecome an AffiliateAdvertise Your ProductsSelf-Publish with UsBecome an Amazon VendorSell Your Subscription on Amazon›See allAmazon Payment ProductsAmazon Rewards Visa Signature CardsAmazon.com Store CardAmazon.com Corporate Credit LineShop with PointsCredit Card MarketplaceReload Your BalanceAmazon Currency ConverterLet Us Help YouYour AccountYour OrdersShipping Rates & PoliciesAmazon PrimeReturns & ReplacementsManage Your Content and DevicesAmazon AssistantHelp




English



United States




Amazon Music Stream millions of songs

Amazon Drive Cloud storage from Amazon

6pm Score deals on fashion brands

AbeBooks Books, art & collectibles

ACX  Audiobook Publishing Made Easy

Alexa Actionable Analytics for the Web

Amazon Business Everything For Your Business

 

AmazonFresh Groceries & More Right To Your Door

AmazonGlobal Ship Orders Internationally

Home Services Handpicked Pros Happiness Guarantee

Amazon Inspire Digital Educational  Resources

Amazon Rapids Fun stories for  kids on the go

Amazon Restaurants Food delivery from local restaurants

Amazon Video Direct Video Distribution Made Easy

 

Amazon Web Services Scalable Cloud Computing Services

Audible Download Audio Books

AudiobookStand Discount Audiobooks on Disc

Book Depository Books With Free Delivery Worldwide

Box Office Mojo Find Movie Box Office Data

ComiXology Thousands of Digital Comics

CreateSpace Indie Print Publishing Made Easy

 

DPReview Digital Photography

East Dane Designer Men's Fashion

Fabric Sewing, Quilting & Knitting

Goodreads Book reviews & recommendations

IMDb Movies, TV & Celebrities

IMDbPro Get Info Entertainment Professionals Need

Junglee.com Shop Online in India

 

Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital Publishing Made Easy


Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Delivery on Everyday Items

Prime Photos Unlimited Photo Storage Free With Prime

Shopbop Designer Fashion Brands

TenMarks.com Math Activities for Kids & Schools

Warehouse Deals Open-Box Discounts

Whispercast Discover & Distribute Digital Content


 

 

Withoutabox Submit to Film Festivals

Woot! Deals and  Shenanigans

Zappos Shoes & Clothing

Souq.com Shop Online in the Middle East

Subscribe with Amazon Discover & try subscription services

 


Conditions of UsePrivacy NoticeInterest-Based Ads© 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates


















Amazon Family







































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















All



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 





















































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started





















 



Prime Members Get 20% off Diapers and More
Prime members save 20% on diapers subscriptions plus additional family-centric discounts and recommendations, compliments of Amazon Family. Amazon Family is free for all Prime members. Simply create a child profile during signup to begin.















Start Your 30-Day Free Trial of Prime



                                After your free trial, Amazon Prime is just $99/year.Cancel anytime.

                                    
Give the gift of Prime
 | Refer a friend | Have a Prime promo code?





















 
Save money on diapers
Subscribing to diapers saves you 20% and a trip to the store

Amazon Family automatically provides Prime members a 20% discount on diapers when ordered with Subscribe & Save.         






 
Exclusive Baby Registry benefits
Upgrade your rewards with Prime

Prime members with a Baby Registry get additional discounts and rewards including a 15% Baby Registry completion discount and access to limited time offers such as a free Welcome Box, compliments of Amazon Family.  For Terms & Conditions visit www.amazon.com/baby-registry-completion-discount        






 
Exclusive Coupons and Deals from Amazon Family
Save on the products your family wants and needs

Prime members are eligible for Amazon Family coupons on products from laundry detergent to granola bars, as well as deals on everyday essentials like diapers.        






 
Amazon FreeTime Unlimited. Endless kid stuff.  No grownup stuff.
Hits kids love from PBS, Nickelodeon, Disney, and more

Amazon FreeTime Unlimited is an all-in-one subscription for kids that offers unlimited access to thousands of kid-friendly books, movies, TV shows, educational apps, and games.  Kids get access to thousands of titles for a low price - starting at just $2.99 per month for Prime Members. Also, because there are no ads and no in-app purchases, there are no surprises and no extra charges.          






 
Stream thousands of movies and TV shows – the whole family will enjoy 
Watch on your TV, tablet, laptop or phone

Instantly stream thousands of blockbuster movies and popular TV shows, including award-winning original children’s series such as Tumble Leaf and Creative Galaxy. You can watch at home or on the go with Fire TV, Fire TV Stick, iPad, iPhone, Android phones, Roku, Xbox, PlayStation, Samsung, Sony and many other devices.           






 
Over a Million Songs. Thousands of Playlists and Stations.
Unlimited music streaming

Prime Music gives you unlimited, ad-free access to over a million songs, thousands of playlists and stations, and exclusive albums such as Lisa Loeb’s Nursery Rhyme Parade! Now you can listen to the music you love and find new music that fits your taste. It’s like having a backstage pass that lets you access your favorite musicians.        






 
When you want it, when you need it
FREE Two-Day shipping with Amazon Prime

With FREE Two-Day Shipping from Amazon Prime, your shopping problems are solved. You get unlimited deliveries with no minimum order size, and with over 50 million eligible items, the options are practically limitless. Prime members also get FREE Same-Day Delivery on over a million items when shipping to select metro areas and FREE Release-Date Delivery on eligible pre-order items within the continental U.S.        






 
All your photos, together at last
Free unlimited photo storage

Your Prime membership comes with free unlimited photo storage through Prime Photos, which lets you securely save as many photos as you like and see them on your phone, computer, or tablet. You can share this Prime benefit and give free photo storage to up to five family members or friends. Collect photos together with your invited family and friends in the Family Vault and store memories from everyone in one safe place. New photo search technology makes it easy to find specific photos by searching for things like “sunset” or “Seattle,” and your photos are organized automatically so it’s easy to find and enjoy them.        






 
Early Access to Deals
Shop Amazon Lightning Deals

Consider yourself a techy, the best-styled fashionista on the block, or just an everyday savvy shopper? Be among the first to decide what's hot and what's not. Get early access to Lightning Deals on Amazon.com 30 minutes before other customers can access these deals.        






 
 A collection beyond compare
 
 A Prime membership includes over 800,000 free ebooks 

Enter the hallowed halls and stocked shelves of the Kindle Owner’s Lending Library, where over 800,000 books are ready to be checked out. Fiction or non-fiction. New York Times best sellers or lost classics. Borrow one book a month, with no due date. Discover your next favorite book, and your next one, and your next one.         






 
Share Prime with your family
 Prime members can share a selection of their Prime benefits 
Create an Amazon Household and share certain Amazon Prime benefits, including FREE Prime Shipping, Prime Video streaming, Amazon Family discounts, unlimited storage space for photos with Prime Photos, and more.







 
Look for 
Prime eligible items, videos, and Kindle books are clearly marked. Just look for the Prime logo when you shop.























  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Amazon   Investor Relations   Amazon Devices      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell Your Services on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Sell Your Apps on Amazon   Become an Affiliate   Advertise Your Products   Self-Publish with Us   Become an Amazon Vendor   Sell Your Subscription on Amazon   › See all      Amazon Payment Products   Amazon Rewards Visa Signature Cards   Amazon.com Store Card   Amazon.com Corporate Credit Line   Shop with Points   Credit Card Marketplace   Reload Your Balance   Amazon Currency Converter      Let Us Help You   Your Account   Your Orders   Shipping Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Assistant   Help                   English   United States          Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       Amazon Drive Cloud storagefrom Amazon       6pm Score dealson fashion brands       AbeBooks Books, art& collectibles       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Alexa Actionable Analyticsfor the Web       Amazon Business Everything ForYour Business          AmazonFresh Groceries & MoreRight To Your Door       AmazonGlobal Ship OrdersInternationally       Home Services Handpicked ProsHappiness Guarantee       Amazon Inspire Digital EducationalResources       Amazon Rapids Fun stories forkids on the go       Amazon Restaurants Food delivery fromlocal restaurants       Amazon Video Direct Video DistributionMade Easy          Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       AudiobookStand Discount Audiobookson Disc       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide       Box Office Mojo Find MovieBox Office Data       ComiXology Thousands ofDigital Comics       CreateSpace Indie Print PublishingMade Easy          DPReview DigitalPhotography       East Dane Designer Men'sFashion       Fabric Sewing, Quilting& Knitting       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       IMDbPro Get Info EntertainmentProfessionals Need       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Items       Prime Photos Unlimited Photo StorageFree With Prime       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       TenMarks.com Math Activitiesfor Kids & Schools       Warehouse Deals Open-BoxDiscounts       Whispercast Discover & DistributeDigital Content               Withoutabox Submit toFilm Festivals       Woot! Deals andShenanigans       Zappos Shoes &Clothing       Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Subscribe with Amazon Discover & trysubscription services               Conditions of Use   Privacy Notice   Interest-Based Ads   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    






v





















 












Amazon.com: Prime Music









































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings























































































Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          




Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          




Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          
















Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.




Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.




Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.
















Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.




Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.




Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.
















Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.




Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.




Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.
















Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.




Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.




Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.
















Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices




Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices




Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices
















Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited




Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited




Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited
















Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v































































































subscribe to stay up-to-date on the best in live music!
Sign up to win 2 VIP tickets!





Name  



Email






 for details click here


















































































































Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


